Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-512
Legislative intent.

Nebraskans, and others throughout the world, have become part of the information age, in which information is a primary element of economic, social, and cultural growth. The ability to move information quickly and accurately through electronic means is critical to the success of education, business, agriculture, health care, government, libraries, communities, and other areas of interest in a global society. A statewide vision and strategy is needed to ensure coordinated development of the telecommunications infrastructure necessary for Nebraska to keep pace worldwide and collaboration among entities within the state and with other states.

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1501;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 282.